Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3314.1 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Board of Regents of the University of Oklahoma is hereby
authorized to establish within the College of Education at the
University of Oklahoma a pilot program to provide high-dosage
mathematics tutoring for the lowest performing ninth-grade students
resulting from the required eighth-grade mathematics assessment
provided for in Section 1210.508 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
B. The pilot program described in subsection A of this section
shall run for public high schools in districts with thirty thousand
(30,000) enrolled students or greater, as well as public charter
schools established pursuant to the Oklahoma Charter School Act.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1287 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1287 Page 3